California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

13151.13.

The board may provide for restrictions on the incurring of additional indebtedness of the district payable out of the revenues out of which the bonds then authorized are to be payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.14.

The board may provide for restrictions on future transfers out of the revenues out of which the bonds then authorized are to be payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.15.

The board may provide for covenants with the holders of bonds to the same effect as set forth in Article 7 of this chapter, which covenants shall not be subject to alteration or repeal, except as in Article 8 of this chapter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.16.

The board may provide for the issuance and distribution in such form as the board may determine of official statements respecting proposed issues of bonds and the properties, operations and finances of the works on account of which such bonds are to be issued, for the information of prospective purchasers of such bonds; and, in any case where any proposition is to be submitted to the voters for their assent, whether by referendum or pursuant to any provision of this chapter, for the issuance, distribution, dissemination and publication of factual statements respecting such proposed issues of bonds, and such properties, operations and finances, for the information of such
 voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.17.

The board may provide for the making of contracts, or the placing of orders, for the engraving or printing of any bonds, whether definitive or temporary, or of interim receipts, authorized by this chapter, or for any printing incident to the offering or issuance of any such bonds, without advertising for bids, in any case where, because of limitations of time, or requirements as to quality of work, or as to security in the control or custody of plates, or any similar cause, the board may deem it to be in the public interest so to do, anything in this division to the contrary notwithstanding, but in so doing the board shall, if practicable, obtain or cause to be obtained
 competitive bids, formal or informal, from bidders who can perform work of the required quality within the required time, and, in the case of engraving, who are of proper responsibility and who have adequate facilities for the control and safekeeping of the engraved plates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13152.

Each issue of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall conform to the following requirements:

(1) Such bonds shall be serial bonds or sinking fund bonds, or a combination of serial and sinking fund bonds.

(2) Provision shall be made for the retirement of such bonds through annual payments on principal, and such payments shall begin not more than 10 years, and end not more than 20 years, after the date of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Validity [13161. - 13166.]

13161.

Prior to the issue of any bonds to be issued pursuant to this chapter, the board, after satisfying itself respecting the relevant facts, shall, by resolution, find and determine—

(1) The amount of earned surplus derived from the operation of the electric system of the district to which the revenues out of which such bonds are to be payable pertain, as of the end of the last fiscal year which ended not less than four months prior to the making of such finding and determination, and that the ascertainment of such earned surplus has been in accordance with the then current accounting practice of the district;
 provided, however, that such finding and determination need not be made in the case of the authorization of refunding bonds, or in any case where the voters have assented to the issuance of bonds in excess of the limitation specified in this chapter.

(2) The amount of bonds issued under this chapter which are outstanding at the time of the adoption of such resolution.

(3) That the resolution or resolutions authorizing such issue of bonds in all respects conforms or conform with the provisions of this chapter.

(4) That the indebtedness to be evidenced by such issue of bonds, together with all other indebtedness of the district, pertaining to the electric system for or on account of which such bonds are to be issued, is within every debt or other limit prescribed by the Constitution and statutes of the State of
 California.

(5) That upon the issuance of such bonds any and all acts, conditions and things required to exist, to happen and to be performed, precedent to and in the issuance thereof, will exist, will have happened and will have been performed, in due time, form and manner, as required by the Constitution and statutes of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13162.

The board may also, by resolution, find and determine any other facts relevant to the legality of the issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13163.

The board, by resolution adopted in connection with any issue of bonds pursuant to this chapter, may direct that there shall be included in each of the bonds of that issue a certification and recital that any and all acts, conditions and things required to exist, to happen and to be performed, precedent to and in the incurring of the indebtedness evidenced by that bond, and in the issuing of said bond, exist, have happened and have been performed in due time, form and manner, as required by the Constitution and statutes of the State of California, and that said bond, together with all other indebtedness of the district pertaining to the electric system for or on account of
 which the indebtedness evidenced by said bond was incurred, is within every debt and other limit prescribed by the Constitution and statutes of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13164.

From and after the issuance of any issue of bonds the findings and determinations of the board respecting that issue made pursuant to this article shall be conclusive evidence of the existence of the facts so found and determined in any action or proceeding in any court in which the validity of such bonds is at issue, and no bona fide purchaser of any such bond containing the certification and recital permitted by this article shall be required to see to the existence of any fact, or to the performance of any condition, or the taking of any proceeding, required prior to such issue, or to the application of the purchase price paid for such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13165.

Bonds shall be deemed to be issued, within the meaning of this article whenever the definitive bonds, or any temporary bonds or interim receipts exchangeable therefor, have been delivered to the purchasers thereof, and the purchase price thereof received, or in the case of bonds to be refunded through exchange, whenever such exchange has been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13166.

The validity of bonds reciting that they have been issued pursuant to this chapter shall not be affected by any provision or limitation contained in any other section or sections of this division. All bonds issued under this chapter shall be incontestable from and after the time of payment to the district of the purchase price thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Proceeds [13171. - 13177.]

13171.

All sums received as accrued interest on the sale of any issue of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be applied to the payment of interest on or principal of bonds of that issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13172.

All sums received as principal and premiums on the sale of any issue of bonds shall be applied to the purposes for which such bonds were issued. The board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issue of any bonds under this chapter that any portion of the proceeds of sale of the bonds may be applied to payment of interest during construction for a period of not to exceed three years from and after the date of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13173.

The board may from time to time establish and maintain a separate fund or funds in the district treasury for the purpose of insuring the application of such proceeds received as principal on the sale of any issue of bonds to the purposes for which the same were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13174.

Money set aside and placed in any such separate fund shall remain therein until from time to time expended for the purposes for which such bonds were issued, including the reimbursement of other funds of the district for expenditures therefrom for purposes for which such bonds were issued, made after the adoption by the board of the preliminary resolution of intention provided for in Section 13101, and shall not be used for any other purpose whatsoever, except for temporary investment thereof as provided in this division; provided, however, that money may be paid or transferred from any such separate fund, in furtherance of the purpose of its establishment, to any other
 such separate fund established for a like purpose in connection with the same issue of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13175.

Money in any such separate fund shall be drawn therefrom only upon demands authenticated by the signature of the accountant of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13176.

If the board shall determine by resolution that the expenditure of the whole or any portion of the said principal sum of any issue of bonds for the purpose for which such bonds were issued is impracticable or unwise, the board may—

(1) Apply such money or any part thereof to the purchase of bonds of that issue, or to the payment of any such bonds, at maturity or on redemption, or to the payment of interest thereon or of premiums due on the redemption thereof; or

(2) Apply such money or any part thereof to any new purpose which is within the
 purposes for which bonds might be issued under the terms of this chapter; provided, however, that before applying any of such money to such new purpose the board shall adopt a resolution specifying such new purpose, the amount of such money to be applied thereto, and authorizing such application, which resolution shall be subject to the same procedures, and take final effect only in the same manner, as if it were a resolution adopted pursuant to Section 13091, authorizing the issuance of bonds for such new purpose, and such resolution authorizing such application to such new purpose, when it shall have taken final effect under such procedures, shall be sufficient authority for the application of such money to such new purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13177.

If any excess of the principal sum of the proceeds of any issue of bonds shall remain unexpended after the full accomplishment of the purpose for which such bonds were issued the board, by resolution, may direct that the same shall be applied to the purchase of bonds of that issue, or to the payment of any such bonds, at maturity or on redemption, or to the payment of interest thereon or of premiums due on the redemption thereof, or that it shall be transferred to the revenues pertaining to the electric system in connection with which such bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Short Term Borrowing [13181. - 13184.]

13181.

A district may also have the power to borrow money from time to time for any or all of the purposes specified in this chapter, and to issue and sell notes, or other evidences, to evidence the indebtedness created by such borrowing, by resolution subject to referendum as provided in Section 13103, whenever they shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the exercise of that power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13182.

All notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued under the authority of this article shall contain upon their face a recital that they are so issued and shall be payable in not to exceed three years from their date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13183.

No amount shall be borrowed under the authority of this article which when added to the amount of all other notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued under this article and then outstanding shall exceed 50 percent of the gross operating revenues from the works on account of which it is borrowed during the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13184.

All of the provisions of this chapter not inconsistent with the terms of this article, and not by their terms made inapplicable thereto, shall apply to all notes, or other evidences, issued under the authority of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Investments [13191. - 13193.]

13191.

Pending use for the purposes for which any reserve fund or special trust account or any other separate fund established pursuant to this chapter was so established, money set aside and placed therein may, when and to such extent and in such manner as may be directed by the said board and as may be consistent with the provisions of any resolutions of the board constituting a part of the proceedings for the issuance of the issue of bonds in connection with which such fund or account was created, be invested in the same manner as are other moneys of the district. Any such bonds or other evidences of indebtedness acquired through such investment may be resold at any
 time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13192.

Any bonds or other securities so purchased shall constitute a part of such reserve fund, separate fund or special trust account, and any interest or any increment received by reason of such investment and the proceeds of any such resale shall be placed in, and constitute a part of, such fund or account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2237.)
-------------------------------------------

13193.

Bonds issued under this chapter may be presented to the State Treasurer for certification under Division 10 of the Water Code in like manner and with the same legal effect as in the case of revenue bonds issued by irrigation districts; provided, that Section 20050 of the Water Code shall not be applicable to such bonds and, notwithstanding such certification, any district may issue subsequent series or issues of bonds without certification as the district may elect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 245.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Bonds [13201. - 13341.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [13201. - 13212.]

13201.

A district may from time to time incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, or completing the whole or any portion of any utility or works referred to in this division, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any public utility or utilities referred to in this division or any works, lands, structures, rights, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may at any subsequent meeting of the board provide for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the resolution to the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13203.

In lieu of a resolution passed by the board, proceedings for the issuance of bonds for the purposes provided in this chapter may be initiated by petition of the voters of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13204.

Whenever any petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast is presented to the board asking for the acquisition, construction, or completion of the whole or any portion of any utility or works referred to in this division or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, and also asking that a bonded indebtedness be incurred to pay for the cost thereof, the secretary of the district shall immediately examine and verify the signatures of the petition and certify the result of the examination to the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13205.

If the required number of signatures is found to be genuine, the secretary shall transmit to the board an authentic copy of the petition without the signatures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13206.

Upon receiving a petition with the certificate of the secretary stating that it contains the required number of signatures, the board shall formulate for submission to the voters of the district at a special bond election called for that purpose the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purposes set forth in the petition. In its discretion the board may defer the calling of the election until the next general election to be held in the district in order to consolidate them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13207.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the utility, works, lands, structures, rights, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 8 percent per annum, payable semiannually. If, however, the rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness does not exceed 412 percent per annum, payable semiannually, the rate of interest need not be recited in the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

13208.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13209.

All special bond elections held in even-numbered years shall be consolidated with the direct primary or general election. All special bond elections held in odd-numbered years shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November and may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. When a special bond election is consolidated with a statewide primary or a general election, the board shall in the ordinance calling the special bond election consolidate it with the statewide primary or the general election to be held at the same time in the respective counties in which the district is located and authorize the respective boards of supervisors to canvass the returns and certify the result of the canvass to the board; it shall be the duty of the board or boards of supervisors to so consolidate the election, canvass the returns, and cause the result thereof to be properly certified to the board. If a special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this chapter setting forth the procedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places, and officers of election, but may provide that the precincts, polling places, and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and title, or by other definite description.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 412.)
-------------------------------------------

13210.

The ordinance shall be published, and no other notice of election need be given.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13211.

The votes of two-thirds of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 761.)
-------------------------------------------

13212.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not within six months after the election hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at the prior election unless a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [13241. - 13244.]

13241.

Bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board; provided, that payment shall begin not more than 10 years from the date of issuance thereof and be completed in not more than 50 years from that date; provided, further, that the board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest maturity of such series, and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

13242.

The bonds shall be issued in such denomination or denominations as the board determines, and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bonds, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

13243.

The board may at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price fixed by the board shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district or if there is no such newspaper printed and published within the district then the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the county in which the district or any part thereof is situated, the first publication of which shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption interest on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13244.

The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the secretary. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures, except that of the treasurer on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed, or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [13261. - 13263.]

13261.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13262.

The proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.

In lieu of the immediate levy of a tax to pay the interest or any part thereof on any bonded indebtedness incurred in accordance with this division, the board may in the estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised by the bonds include a sum sufficient to pay interest on all of the bonds or part thereof during the period of acquisition, construction, or completion, but for no period in excess of five years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding [13281. - 13288.]

13281.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the refunding of the whole or any portion of the bonded indebtedness will be of advantage to the district the board may refund the bonded indebtedness or any portion thereof and issue refunding bonds of the district therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13282.

The issuance of refunding bonds shall not be construed as the incurring or increase of an indebtedness within the meaning of this division, and the approval of the voters is not required for the issuance of refunding bonds. The board may provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13284.

Only the property in a special district is taxable for the payment of the principal and interest on any refunding bonds which are issued for the purpose of refunding any indebtedness of a special district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13285.

Except as provided in this article, matters pertaining to the issuance of refunding bonds under this chapter shall be governed by Article 9 (commencing with Section 53550) and Article 10 (commencing with Section 53570), Chapter 3, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 510.)
-------------------------------------------

13286.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be applied only to the purchase, or retirement at not more than par and accrued interest, or the call price, of the bonded indebtedness for which the refunding bonds were issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13287.

In lieu of selling refunding bonds and using the proceeds to purchase or retire the bonds to be refunded, the board may exchange refunding bonds at not less than par and accrued interest for the bonds so refunded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13288.

Whenever outstanding bonds are refunded they shall be surrendered to the treasurer of the district, who shall cancel them by endorsing on their face the manner in which the refunding was effected (whether by exchange or purchase, and the amount for which so purchased, if any) and by perforating through each bond and each coupon attached thereto the word “canceled” together with the date of cancellation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Status as Investments [13311. - 13312.]

13311.

All bonds including refunding bonds issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund, and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts, in the State, such money or funds may be invested in or loaned upon the security of the bonds of a district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as security for the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be so used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13312.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the State as security for the deposit of funds of the State or of any county, city and county, city, municipality, or other public or municipal corporation within the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Validating Proceedings [13341. - 13341.]

13341.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1520.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.1. Emergency Financing [13345. - 13347.]



  ARTICLE 1. Incurring Indebtedness for Repair or Replacement of Damaged or Demolished Works [13345. - 13347.]

13345.

Whenever the board, by resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of all members of the board of a five-ward district, or by a five-sevenths vote of all members of the board of a seven-ward district, finds and determines that any part of the works of the district has been damaged or demolished by reason of fire, flood, earthquake, sabotage, or act of God or the public enemy, and that the cost of repairing or replacing the works so damaged or demolished is too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, and that the public interest requires the incurring of indebtedness for the purposes set forth in the resolution, the board may authorize the incurring of indebtedness for this purpose pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 984, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13346.

Whenever the board makes the finding and determination as described in Section 13345, the district may borrow money and incur indebtedness by the issuance of bonds, notes, or other securities as provided in this chapter by action of the board and without the necessity of calling and holding an election in the district. These evidences of indebtedness shall constitute general obligations of the district or shall be payable solely from revenues of the district as the board may determine in the resolution authorizing their issuance. The indebtedness may be incurred for any purpose for which the district is authorized to expend funds.

The indebtedness incurred under this chapter shall be evidenced by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness maturing in not to exceed five years from their date, shall bear interest at the rate or rates fixed by the board, and may be issued and sold at a public or private sale as the board may direct. All other terms and conditions of these evidences of indebtedness shall be fixed by the board. The maximum principal amount of all general obligation indebtedness outstanding under this chapter shall not, at any one time, exceed 1 percent of the assessed valuation of the property within the district taxable for district purposes.

The board may authorize and issue refunding notes for the purpose of paying and redeeming at or before maturity any notes previously issued and then outstanding. However, these refunding notes shall not be in excess of the limitation of indebtedness provided in this section and shall mature in not to exceed five years from the dates of the original indebtedness. Refunding notes may in turn be refunded under similar terms and conditions, except that no refunding note shall mature in excess of five years from the date of the original indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 984, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13347.

Indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter shall be payable from any sources of available funds, including revenues, taxes, or state or federal grants. The board may levy and collect taxes upon all property in the district subject to taxation by the district without limitation of rate or amount for the payment of any evidences of general obligation indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter and the interest thereon. These taxes shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for district purposes and shall be levied at the same time and in the same manner as other district taxes are levied and, when collected, shall be deposited in a special fund and shall be used only for the payment of the principal of and interest on this indebtedness. The board shall apply for any federal or state funds available for purposes of repairing or replacing works damaged or demolished by reason of fire, flood, earthquake, sabotage, or act of God or the public enemy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 984, Sec. 4.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Short-Term Borrowing [13371. - 13392.]



  ARTICLE 1. Proceedings for Incurring Short-Term Indebtedness [13371. - 13379.]

13371.

A district may borrow money and incur indebtedness for the purposes of this chapter by the issuance of bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness by a majority vote of its board of directors and without the necessity of calling and holding an election in the district. Such evidences of indebtedness shall constitute general obligations of the district or shall be payable solely from the revenues of the district as the board may determine in the resolution authorizing their issuance; provided, that if the board determines that the evidences of indebtedness shall constitute general obligations of the district, their issuance shall be approved by a four-fifths vote of the board. Such indebtedness may be incurred for any of the following purposes:

(a) The purchase, processing, storage, and disposal of fuel to be used for the generation and transmission of electricity, of materials to be used in the manufacture of such fuel, and of the products of such fuel, the purchase of real property and manufacturing and processing facilities from which such fuel or materials may be obtained, or interests therein.

(b) The planning, design, engineering, and licensing of facilities for the generation or transmission of electricity, and the preparation of sites and the purchase of equipment for such facilities.

(c) The planning, design, engineering, acquisition, or construction of facilities for the storage, transmission, or distribution of water.

(d) The planning, design, engineering, acquisition, or construction of facilities for the storage, transmission, or treatment of sewage or byproducts of sewage treatment.

(e) The replacement of works of the district that have been damaged or demolished by reason of fire, flood, earthquake, sabotage, or acts of God or the public enemy.

(f) Any expenses or charges incurred in connecton with the foregoing purposes, and to reimburse the district for expenditures incurred for any of such purposes.

The indebtedness incurred under this chapter shall be evidenced by bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness maturing in not to exceed seven years from their date, shall not result in interest costs exceeding such limits as may be fixed by the board, and may be sold either by public or by private sale. All other terms and conditions of such evidences of indebtedness shall be fixed by the board. The district may arrange for bank credit for the purposes of this section or to provide an additional source of repayment for indebtedness incurred under this chapter. The maximum principal amount of all indebtedness outstanding under this article, including the amounts drawn on available bank lines of credit, shall not at any one time exceed the lesser of either (1) the annual average of the total revenue for the three preceding years or (2) 25 percent of the district’s total outstanding bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 12701), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 13201), and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 13451).

The authority contained in this chapter shall be in addition to the authority contained in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 12701), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 13201), and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 13451), and any indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter shall not be included in ascertaining the aggregate indebtedness permitted by Section 12842.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 430, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13372.
